Utah statutes.
53-8-104.   Superintendent's duties.
The superintendent shall:
(1)  divide the state highways into sections for the purpose of patrolling and
policing;
(2)  employ peace officers known as highway patrol troopers to patrol or
police the highways within this state and to enforce the state statutes as
required;
(3)  establish ranks, grades, and positions in the Highway Patrol and
designate the authority and responsibility in each rank, grade, and position;
(4)  establish for the Highway Patrol standards and qualifications and fix
prerequisites of training, education, and experience for each rank, grade, and
position;
(5)  appoint personnel to each rank, grade, and position necessary for the
efficient operation and administration of the Highway Patrol;
(6)  devise and administer examinations designed to test applicants for
positions with the Highway Patrol;
(7)  make rules governing the Highway Patrol as appear to the superintendent
advisable;
(8)  discharge, demote, or temporarily suspend any employee in the Highway
Patrol for cause;
(9)  prescribe the uniforms to be worn and the equipment to be used by
employees of the Highway Patrol;
(10)  charge against each employee of the  Highway Patrol the value of any
property of the state lost or destroyed through the carelessness of the
employee;
(11)  establish, with the approval of the Division of Finance, the terms and
conditions under which expense allowance should be paid to any employee of the
Highway Patrol while away from his station;
(12)  station the Highway Patrol in localities as he finds advisable for the
enforcement of the laws of this state;
(13)  conduct in conjunction with the State Board of Education in and through
all state schools  an educational campaign in highway safety and work in
conjunction with civic organizations, churches, local units of government, and
other organizations that may function in accomplishing the purposes of
reducing highway accidents;
(14)  provide the initial mandatory uniform items for each new trooper hired
after July 1, 1998;
(15)  determine by rule a basic uniform allowance system which includes the
manner in which troopers may receive maintenance services and vouchers for
basic uniforms and administer any funds appropriated by the Legislature to the
division for that purpose; and
(16)  on or before January 1, 2003, adopt a written policy that prohibits the
stopping, detention, or search of any person when the action is solely
motivated by considerations of race, color, ethnicity, age, or gender.
